Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 10. Electric Reliability Organizations, Plans, and Standards.

Sec. 42.05.760.
Electric reliability organizations.

An electric utility must participate in an electric reliability organization if the utility operates in an interconnected electric energy transmission network served by an electric reliability organization certificated by the commission. The commission may not require an electric reliability organization for an interconnected bulk-electric system if all of the load-serving entities operating in the interconnected bulk-electric system are exempt under AS

42.05.711(b)

.

A person may submit to the commission an application for certification as an electric reliability organization for an interconnected bulk-electric system. The commission may certificate one electric reliability organization for each interconnected electric energy transmission network. The commission may certificate an electric reliability organization if the commission determines that the electric reliability organization has the ability to comply with AS

42.05.762

.

The commission shall immediately notify the interconnected load-serving entities within a new or existing interconnected bulk-electric system of the requirements of this section.

Notwithstanding the requirements in (e) of this section, if all load-serving entities within an interconnected bulk-electric system petition the commission for an exemption from the requirement to establish an electric reliability organization for the interconnected electric energy transmission network, the commission may waive the requirement to form an electric reliability organization for that interconnected electric energy transmission network.

The commission shall form and certificate an electric reliability organization for an interconnected bulk-electric system under this section if, within

90 days after the commission notifies the interconnected load-serving entities under (c) of this section, no person has applied for certification as an electric reliability organization for that interconnected bulk-electric system; or

270 days after the commission notifies the interconnected load-serving entities under (c) of this section, the commission has not certificated an electric reliability organization for that interconnected bulk-electric system.

The commission may certificate an electric reliability organization for an interconnected electric energy transmission network that is not an interconnected bulk-electric system if

one or more load-serving entities within that network successfully petition the commission to find that an electric reliability organization should be established for the network; and

a person applies for certification as an electric reliability organization for the network.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.762.
Duties of an electric reliability organization.

An electric reliability organization shall

develop reliability standards that provide for an adequate level of reliability of an interconnected electric energy transmission network;

develop integrated resource plans under AS

42.05.780(a)

;

establish rules to

ensure that the directors of the electric reliability organization and the electric reliability organization act independently from users, owners, and operators of the interconnected electric energy transmission network;

equitably allocate reasonable dues, fees, and other charges among all load-serving entities connected to the interconnected electric energy transmission network for all activities under AS

42.05.760

—

42.05.790

;

provide fair and impartial procedures for the enforcement of reliability standards;

provide for reasonable notice and opportunity for public comment, due process, openness, and balancing of interests in exercising its duties; and

be governed by a board that

includes as nonvoting members the chair of the commission or the chair’s designee and the attorney general or the attorney general’s designee; and

is formed as

an independent board;

a balanced stakeholder board; or

a combination independent and balanced stakeholder board.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.765.
Reliability standards.

An electric reliability organization shall file each reliability standard or modification to a reliability standard with the commission as a new or revised tariff provision. All users, owners, and operators of an interconnected electric energy transmission network served by an electric reliability organization, including a user, owner, or operator that is exempt from other regulation under AS

42.05.711

or another provision of this chapter, shall comply with reliability standards contained in a tariff that is approved by the commission. The commission may enforce a reliability standard approved under this section. A reliability standard approved under this section

shall provide for the reliable operation of the interconnected electric energy transmission network or of an interconnected electric energy transmission network facility;

may provide for

protection from a cybersecurity incident;

facility security;

additions or modifications to an interconnected bulk-electric system facility to the extent necessary to provide for reliable operation of the interconnected electric energy transmission network;

may result in, but may not be designed for the purpose of, requiring enlargement of interconnected bulk-electric system facilities or construction of new transmission capacity or generation capacity.

The commission may, after public notice, approve a proposed reliability standard or modification to a reliability standard submitted by an electric reliability organization. The commission shall determine whether the proposed standard or modification is just, reasonable, not unduly discriminatory or preferential, and in the public interest before approving the standard or modification. If, after public notice and a hearing, the commission determines that a proposed reliability standard or modification to a reliability standard submitted by an electric reliability organization should be changed, the commission shall return the standard to the electric reliability organization for timely modification and resubmission, consistent with the commission’s order. The commission may modify a resubmitted standard if the commission determines that the standard is inconsistent with the commission’s order or the public interest. A standard approved under this subsection satisfies the requirements of AS

42.05.291(c)

.

The commission may, on its own motion or upon complaint, order an electric reliability organization to submit to the commission a proposed reliability standard or modification to a reliability standard that addresses a specific matter.

If a reliability standard adopted under this section conflicts with a function, rule, tariff, rate schedule, or agreement that has also been accepted, approved, adopted, or ordered by the commission, a user, owner, or operator shall comply with the function, rule, tariff, rate schedule, or agreement until the conflict is resolved by the commission.

If, as a condition of a contract with the United States Department of Defense, a user, owner, or operator is subject to a federal standard, rule, or function that conflicts with a reliability standard adopted under this section, the user, owner, or operator shall comply with the federal standard, rule, or function until the conflict is resolved by the commission. The commission may not resolve the conflict in a manner that prevents the user, owner, or operator from fulfilling the contract with the United States Department of Defense.

The commission may direct an electric reliability organization to conduct assessments of the reliability and adequacy of the interconnected electric energy transmission network.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.767.
Electric reliability organization rules; approval.

An electric reliability organization shall file with the commission each proposed rule or proposed rule change, along with an explanation of the basis and purpose of the proposed rule or proposed rule change. The commission may, on its own motion or upon complaint, propose a change to the rules of an electric reliability organization. A rule change proposed by the commission takes effect upon a finding by the commission, after notice and opportunity for public comment, that the rule change is just, reasonable, not unduly discriminatory or preferential, and in the public interest.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.770.
Regulations.

The commission shall adopt regulations governing electric reliability organizations, reliability standards, and modifications to reliability standards consistent with this section. Regulations under AS

42.05.760

—

42.05.790

must

require that an electric reliability organization’s tariff include

standards for nondiscriminatory open access transmission and interconnection;

standards for transmission system cost recovery;

provide a process to identify and resolve conflicts between a reliability standard and a function, rule, tariff, rate schedule, or agreement that has been accepted, approved, adopted, or ordered by the commission;

allow an electric reliability organization to recover its costs through surcharges added to the rate for each participating load-serving entity.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.772.
Duties of load-serving entities.

All load-serving entities, including load-serving entities otherwise exempt from regulation under this chapter, in an interconnected bulk-electric system served by an electric reliability organization are subject to the electric reliability organization’s tariff on file with the commission.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.775.
Penalties.

An electric reliability organization may impose a penalty on a user, owner, or operator of an interconnected electric energy transmission network for a violation of a reliability standard if, after notice and a hearing, the electric reliability organization

finds that the user, owner, or operator has violated a reliability standard; and

files notice of the proposed penalty and the record of the proceeding with the commission at least 30 days before imposition of the penalty.

The commission may, on its own motion or upon complaint, order a user, owner, or operator of an interconnected electric energy transmission network to comply with a reliability standard and impose a penalty against the user, owner, or operator if the commission finds, after notice and a hearing, that the user, owner, or operator has engaged or is about to engage in an act or practice that violates a reliability standard.

A user, owner, or operator may appeal to the commission a penalty imposed under (a) of this section. The commission may, on its own motion, review a penalty imposed under (a) of this section. The commission shall, after notice and a hearing, issue an order affirming, modifying, reinstating, or revoking the penalty or remand the penalty to the electric reliability organization for further proceedings. Unless otherwise ordered by the commission, a penalty shall remain in effect during proceedings under this subsection. The commission shall expedite proceedings under this subsection.

A penalty imposed under this section must bear a reasonable relation to the seriousness of the violation and take into consideration the effort of a user, owner, or operator to remedy the violation in a timely manner.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.780.
Integrated resource planning.

An electric reliability organization shall file with the commission in a petition for approval an integrated resource plan for meeting the reliability requirements of all customers within its interconnected electric energy transmission network in a manner that provides the greatest value, consistent with the load-serving entities’ obligations. An integrated resource plan must contain an evaluation of the full range of cost-effective means for load-serving entities to meet the service requirements of all customers, including additional generation, transmission, battery storage, and conservation or similar improvements in efficiency. An integrated resource plan must include options to meet customers’ collective needs in a manner that provides the greatest value, consistent with the public interest, regardless of the location or ownership of new facilities or conservation activities.

The commission shall, after public notice and review of the process used to develop an integrated resource plan, approve or modify an integrated resource plan filed under (a) of this section, consistent with the public interest. The commission shall determine whether the petition is complete, has been publicly noticed, and is consistent with the commission’s regulations and orders. The commission may reject all or part of a petition that does not comply with the commission’s form or filing regulations. Within 45 days after receipt, the commission shall approve the petition or suspend the petition to an investigation docket. If a petition is not suspended to an investigation docket within 45 days, the petition is considered approved. If, after public notice and a hearing, the commission concludes that the plan requires modification, the commission shall return the plan to the electric reliability organization for timely modification and refiling, consistent with the commission’s order. The commission may modify a refiled integrated resource plan if the commission determines that the plan is inconsistent with the commission’s order or the public interest.

The commission may include in a public utility’s rates

the cost of resources acquired in accordance with an integrated resource plan adopted under this section;

cost-effective expenditures for improving the efficiency with which a public utility provides and its customers use utility services; and

the cost of a utility to comply with the planning requirements of this section, including planning costs and portfolio development costs.

The commission shall adopt regulations governing the filing of a plan under this section, including the content of a plan, time for filing a plan, criteria for determining cost-effectiveness and greatest value, and other criteria as determined by the commission.

In this section,

“planning costs” means the costs of evaluating the future demand for services and alternative methods of satisfying future demand;

“portfolio development costs” means the costs of preparing a resource in a portfolio for timely acquisition of the resource.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.785.
Project preapproval for large energy facilities.

A public utility, including a public utility that is exempt from other regulation under AS

42.05.711

or another provision of this chapter, that is interconnected with an interconnected electric energy transmission network served by an electric reliability organization certificated by the commission may not construct a large energy facility unless the commission determines that the facility

is necessary to the interconnected electric energy transmission network with which it would be interconnected;

complies with reliability standards; and

would, in a cost-effective manner, meet the needs of a load-serving entity that is substantially served by the facility.

Unless the commission finds otherwise by clear and convincing evidence, a large energy facility that was included in the most recent integrated resource plan approved under AS

42.05.780

is considered to satisfy the requirements of (a) of this section.

The commission may not require preapproval for a

project for refurbishment or capitalized maintenance;

hydropower project licensed by the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission before September 30, 2016.

The commission shall adopt regulations

governing project preapproval;

defining refurbishment and capitalized maintenance;

maintaining municipal jurisdiction over local planning decisions; and

addressing projects undertaken before integrated resource plan approval for an interconnected electric energy transmission network.

In this section, “large energy facility” means

an electric power generating plant or combination of plants at a single site with a combined capacity of 15,000 kilowatts or more with transmission lines that directly interconnect the plant with the transmission system;

a high-voltage, above-ground transmission line that

has a capacity of 69 kilovolts or more; and

is longer than 10 miles;

a high-voltage submarine or underground cable that

has a capacity of 69 kilovolts or more; and

is longer than three miles;

an energy storage device or combination of devices at a single site with a combined capacity of 15,000 kilowatts and one hour or more of energy storage that directly connects with the interconnected bulk-electric system; and

a reactive compensation device or combination of devices at a single site with a combined reactive capability of 15,000 kilovars or more with a step-up device to regulate interconnected bulk-electric system voltage.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.

Sec. 42.05.790.
Definitions.

In AS

42.05.760

—

42.05.790

,

“cybersecurity incident” means a malicious act or suspicious event that disrupts or attempts to disrupt the security of data or the operation of programmable electronic devices and communication networks, including hardware and software that are essential to the reliable operation of the interconnected electric energy transmission network;

“electric reliability organization” means an organization that is certificated by the commission under AS

42.05.760

;

“electric utility” means a public utility that provides electricity service;

“interconnected bulk-electric system” means an interconnected electric energy transmission network that includes two or more load-serving entities, at least one of which is subject to the provisions of AS

42.05.291

;

“interconnected electric energy transmission network” means a network of interconnected electrical generation resources, transmission lines, interconnections, and associated equipment operated at voltages of 69 kilovolts or more, operating in a geographic area that are synchronized so that the failure of one or more of the components may adversely affect the ability of the operators of other components within the system to maintain reliable operation of the facilities within the control of the operators;

“load-serving entity” means an electric utility that has a service obligation to distribute power to more than 10 customers that receive invoices directly from the entity;

“reliable operation” means operating the elements of the interconnected electric energy transmission network within equipment and electric system thermal, voltage, and stability limits so that instability, uncontrolled separation, or cascading failures of the system will not occur as a result of a sudden disturbance, including a cybersecurity incident, or unanticipated failure of system elements.

History.

(§ 21 ch 29 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 25,
ch. 29, SLA 2020 makes this section effective July 1, 2021.